Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 4 Arkansas Water and Air Pollution Control Act
8-4-303. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Air-cleaning device” means any method, process, or equipment which removes, reduces, or renders less noxious air contaminants discharged into the atmosphere;

“Air contaminant” means any solid, liquid, gas, or vapor or any combination thereof;

“Air contamination” means the presence in the outdoor atmosphere of one (1) or more air contaminants that contribute to a condition of air pollution;

“Air contamination source” means any source at, from, or by reason of which there is emitted into the atmosphere any air contaminant, regardless of who owns or operates the building, premises, or other property in, at, or on which such source is located or the facility, equipment, or other property by which the emission is caused or from which the emission comes;

“Air pollution” means the presence in the outdoor atmosphere of one (1) or more air contaminants in quantities, of characteristics, and of a duration that are materially injurious or can be reasonably expected to become materially injurious to human, plant, or animal life or to property, or that unreasonably interfere with enjoyment of life or use of property throughout the state or throughout the area of the state as shall be affected thereby;

“Area of the state” means any city or county, or portion thereof, or other substantial geographical area of the state as may be designated by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission;

“Commission” means the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission;

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

“Major source construction” means the construction of a new major stationary source or a major modification of an existing major stationary source as the terms “major stationary source” and “major modification” are defined in 40 C.F.R. § 51.165, if applicable, or 40 C.F.R. § 51.166, as they existed on July 1, 2012;

“NAAQS state implementation plan” means a state implementation plan that specifies measures to be used in the implementation of the state's duties under 42 U.S.C. § 7410, for the attainment and maintenance of a specified National Ambient Air Quality Standard;

“National Ambient Air Quality Standard” or “NAAQS” means a national primary or secondary ambient air quality standard established under Title I of the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7401 et seq., and 40 C.F.R. Part 50;

“Person” means any individual, partnership, firm, company, public or private corporation, association, joint-stock company, trust, estate, political subdivision, or any agency, board, department, or bureau of the state, or any other legal entity whatever that is recognized by law as the subject of rights and duties; and

“State implementation plan” means a plan that specifies measures to be used in the implementation of the state's duties under the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7401 et seq., and that is developed by the division and submitted to the United States Environmental Protection Agency for review and approval.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 2], § 3, as added by Acts 1965, No. 183, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1933; Acts 1997, No. 1219, § 6; 1999, No. 1164, § 30; 2013, No. 1302, § 1; 2017, No. 455, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2521, 2522.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment added present (10) through (12) and (14).

The 2017 amendment substituted “duties under 42 U.S.C. § 7410” for “duties under the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7401 et seq.” in (11).

The 2019 amendment repealed (8) and (9); and substituted “division” for “department” in (14).

8-4-304. Applicability of water pollution provisions.

All provisions of §§ 8-4-101 et seq. and 8-4-201 et seq. relating to water pollution shall apply to this subchapter unless manifestly inconsistent therewith, including, but not limited to, the provisions of §§ 8-4-205, 8-4-212 — 8-4-214, and 8-4-218 — 8-4-229 relating to hearings before the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, notice, right to appeal, and procedure, and § 8-4-230 relating to variances and interim authority.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 2], § 10, as added by Acts 1965, No. 183, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1940; Acts 1995, No. 943, § 2.

8-4-305. Exceptions.

The provisions of this subchapter do not apply to:

Agricultural operations in the growing or harvesting of crops and the raising of fowl or animals;

Use of equipment in agricultural operations in the growing of crops or the raising of fowl or animals;

Barbecue equipment or outdoor fireplaces used in connection with any residence;

Land clearing operations or land grading;

Road construction operations and the use of mobile and portable equipment and machinery incident thereto;

Incinerators and heating equipment in or used in connection with residences used exclusively as dwellings for not more than four (4) families;

Fires set or permitted by any public officer, board, council, or commission when the fire is set or permission to burn is given in the performance of the duty of the public officer, board, council, or commission for the purpose of weed abatement, the prevention or elimination of a fire hazard, or the instruction of employees in the methods of fire fighting, which is necessary in the opinion of the public officer, board, council, or commission, or from fires set pursuant to permit for the purpose of instruction of employees of private industrial concerns in methods of fire fighting, or for civil defense instruction; or

Unless prohibited by municipal or county ordinance, open fires used at a construction site only for the purpose of warming persons on the site during cold weather.

Such fires:

Shall be fueled only by wood or wood products;

Must be controlled to the extent necessary to prevent a fire hazard or local nuisance; and

Must be confined within a container made of nonflammable material.

The container shall not exceed thirty inches (30") in width and thirty inches (30") in length.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 2], § 4, as added by Acts 1965, No. 183, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1934; Acts 1997, No. 259, § 1; 2019, No. 693, § 8.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “public officer, board, council, or commission” for “officer” twice in (7).

8-4-306. Political subdivisions preempted — Exception.

In order to avoid conflicting and overlapping jurisdiction, it is the intention of this chapter to occupy, by preemption, the field of control and abatement of air pollution and contamination and no political subdivision of this state shall enact or enforce laws, ordinances, resolutions, rules, or regulations in this field.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, any political subdivision of this state may enact and enforce laws, ordinances, resolutions, rules, or regulations for the purpose of prohibiting burning in the open or in a receptacle having no means for significantly controlling the fuel/air ratio.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent private actions under existing laws.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 2], § 12, as added by Acts 1965, No. 183, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1941; Acts 1989, No. 765, § 1.

8-4-307. Private rights unchanged.

Persons other than the state or the Division of Environmental Quality shall not acquire actionable right by virtue of this subchapter. The basis for proceedings that result from violation of any standard or rule promulgated by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall inure solely to and shall be for the benefit of the people of the state generally, and it is not intended to create in any way new rights or to enlarge existing rights or to abrogate existing private rights.

A determination by the division that air pollution or air contamination exists or that any standard or rule has been violated, whether or not a proceeding or action is brought by the state, shall not create, by reason thereof, any presumption of law or finding of fact that shall inure to or be for the benefit of any person other than the state.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 2], § 14, as added by Acts 1965, No. 183, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1943; Acts 1997, No. 1219, § 6; 2019, No. 315, § 488; 2019, No. 910, § 2523.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “or rule” for “rule or regulation” in (a) and (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b).

8-4-308. Industrial secrets confidential.

Any information that constitutes a trade secret under § 4-75-601 et seq. that is obtained by the employees of the Department of Energy and Environment, the Division of Environmental Quality, or the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission in the administration of this chapter shall be kept confidential, except for emission data that is submitted to the state, local agency, or the United States Environmental Protection Agency, which is otherwise obtained by any of those agencies pursuant to the Clean Air Act.

Only such emission data is to be publicly available.

The manner and rate of operation of the source, if such information is a trade secret, shall be kept confidential.

Provided, that the identity, amount, frequency, and concentration of the emissions is publicly available.

Any violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable under § 8-4-103.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 2], § 7, as added by Acts 1965, No. 183, § 7; 1983, No. 657, § 1; 1985, No. 763, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1937; Acts 1995, No. 907, § 1; 1997, No. 1219, § 6; 2019, No. 693, § 9; 2019, No. 910, § 2524.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 693 substituted “is a misdemeanor punishable under § 8-4-103” for “shall be unlawful and constitutes a misdemeanor” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910, in (a)(1)(A), substituted “employees of the Department of Energy and Environment, the Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality”, and deleted “or its employees” following “Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission”.

U.S. Code.

The Clean Air Act, referred to in this section, is codified primarily as 42 U.S.C. § 7401 et seq.

Cross References.

Misdemeanors, § 5-1-107.

8-4-309. Construction limited — Exception.

Nothing contained in this subchapter shall be construed as amending or repealing § 20-21-201 et seq. concerning the control of radiation or as granting to the Division of Environmental Quality or the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission any jurisdiction or authority with respect to air conditions existing solely within the property boundaries of any plant, works, or shop or with respect to employer-employee relationships as to health and safety hazards.

Notwithstanding the preceding limitation, the division and the commission shall have jurisdiction and authority over air conditions associated with the removal, encapsulation, enclosure, transportation, or disposal of asbestos-containing material regardless of whether such removal, encapsulation, enclosure, transportation, or disposal is conducted within the property boundaries of any plant, works, or shop.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 2], § 13, as added by Acts 1965, No. 183, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1942; Acts 1989, No. 559, § 1; 1997, No. 1219, § 6; 2019, No. 910, § 2525.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b).

8-4-310. Unlawful actions.

It is a misdemeanor punishable under § 8-4-103:

To knowingly cause air pollution as defined in § 8-4-303;

To construct, install, use, or operate any source capable of emitting air contaminants without having first obtained a permit to do so, if required by rule of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, or to do so contrary to the provisions of any permit issued by the Division of Environmental Quality or after any such permit has been suspended or revoked; or

To violate any rule or order of the commission issued pursuant to this chapter.

The liabilities imposed for violation of subdivisions (a)(1)-(3) of this section or any other provision of this chapter shall not apply with respect to any unintended violation caused by war, strike, riot, or other catastrophe, or accidental breakdown of equipment if promptly repaired.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 2], § 8, as added by Acts 1965, No. 183, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1938; Acts 1997, No. 1219, § 6; 2019, No. 315, § 489; 2019, No. 693, § 10; 2019, No. 910, § 2526.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rule” for “the regulations” in (a)(2); and deleted “regulation” following “rule” in (a)(3).

The 2019 amendment by No. 693 substituted “is a misdemeanor punishable under § 8-4-103” for “shall be unlawful and constitute a misdemeanor” in the introductory language of (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(2).

Cross References.

Misdemeanors, § 5-1-107.

8-4-311. Powers generally.

The Division of Environmental Quality or its successor shall have the power to:

Develop and effectuate a comprehensive program for the prevention and control of all sources of pollution of the air of this state;

Advise, consult, and cooperate with other agencies of the state, political subdivisions, industries, other states, the United States Government, and with affected groups in the furtherance of the purposes of this subchapter;

Encourage and conduct studies, investigations, and research relating to air pollution and its causes, prevention, control, and abatement as it may deem advisable and necessary;

Collect and disseminate information relative to air pollution and its prevention and control;

Consider complaints and make investigations;

Encourage voluntary cooperation by the people, municipalities, counties, industries, and others in preserving and restoring the purity of the air within the state;

Administer and enforce all laws and rules relating to pollution of the air;

Represent the state in all matters pertaining to plans, procedures, or negotiations for interstate compacts in relation to air pollution control;

Cooperate with and receive moneys from the United States Government or any other source for the study and control of air pollution.

The division is designated as the official state air pollution control agency for such purposes;

Make, issue, modify, revoke, and enforce orders prohibiting, controlling, or abating air pollution, and requiring the adoption of remedial measures to prevent, control, or abate air pollution;

Institute court proceedings to compel compliance with the provisions of this chapter and rules and orders issued pursuant to this chapter;

Exercise all of the powers in the control of air pollution granted to the division for the control of water pollution under §§ 8-4-101 — 8-4-106 and 8-4-201 — 8-4-229; and

Develop and implement state implementation plans provided that the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall retain all powers and duties regarding promulgation of rules under this chapter.

The commission shall have the power to:

Promulgate rules for implementing the substantive statutes charged to the division for administration.

In promulgation of such rules, prior to the submittal to public comment and review of any rule or change to any rule that is more stringent than federal requirements, the commission shall duly consider the economic impact and the environmental benefit of such rule on the people of the State of Arkansas, including those entities that will be subject to the rule.

The commission shall promptly initiate rulemaking to further implement the analysis required under subdivision (b)(1)(B) of this section.

The extent of the analysis required under subdivision (b)(1)(B) of this section shall be defined in the commission's rulemaking required under subdivision (b)(1)(C) of this section. It will include a written report that shall be available for public review along with the proposed rule in the public comment period.

Upon completion of the public comment period, the commission shall compile a rulemaking record or response to comments demonstrating a reasoned evaluation of the relative impact and benefits of the more stringent rule;

Promulgate rules and procedures not otherwise governed by applicable law that the commission deems necessary to secure public participation in environmental decision-making processes;

Promulgate rules governing administrative procedures for challenging or contesting division actions;

In the case of permitting or grants decisions, provide the right to appeal a permitting or grants decision rendered by the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality or his or her delegatee;

In the case of an administrative enforcement or emergency action, provide the right to contest any such action initiated by the director;

Instruct the director to prepare such reports or perform such studies as will advance the cause of environmental protection in the state;

Make recommendations to the director regarding overall policy and administration of the division, provided, however, that the director shall always remain within the plenary authority of the Governor and the Secretary of the Department of Energy and Environment;

Upon a majority vote, initiate review of any director's decision;

Adopt, after notice and public hearing, reasonable and nondiscriminatory rules requiring the registration of and the filing of reports by persons engaged in operations that may result in air pollution;

Adopt, after notice and public hearing, reasonable and nondiscriminatory rules, including requiring a permit or other regulatory authorization from the division, before any equipment causing the issuance of air contaminants may be built, erected, altered, replaced, used, or operated, except in the case of repairs or maintenance of equipment for which a permit has been previously used, and revoke or modify any permit issued under this chapter or deny any permit when it is necessary, in the opinion of the division, to prevent, control, or abate air pollution.

A permit shall be issued for the operation or use of any equipment or any facility in existence upon the effective date of any rule requiring a permit if proper application is made for the permit.

No such permit shall be modified or revoked without prior notice and hearing as provided in this section.

Any person that is denied a permit by the division or that has such permit revoked or modified shall be afforded an opportunity for a hearing in connection therewith upon written application made within thirty (30) days after service of notice of such denial, revocation, or modification.

The operation of any existing equipment or facility for which a proper permit application has been made shall not be interrupted pending final action thereon.

An applicant or permit holder that has had a complete application for a permit or for a modification of a permit pending longer than the time specified in the state rules promulgated pursuant to Title V of the Clean Air Act Amendments of 1990, 42 U.S.C. § 7661 et seq., or any person that participated in the public participation process, and any other person that could obtain judicial review of such actions under state laws, may petition the commission for relief from division inaction.

The commission will either deny or grant the petition within forty-five (45) days of its submittal.

For the purposes of judicial review, either a commission denial or the failure of the division to render a final decision within thirty (30) days after the commission has granted a petition shall constitute final agency action;

Establish through its rulemaking authority, either alone or in conjunction with the appropriate state or local agencies, a system for the banking and trading of air emissions designed to maintain both the state's attainment status with the national ambient air quality standards mandated by the Clean Air Act and the overall air quality of the state.

The commission may consider differential valuation of emission credits as necessary to achieve primary and secondary national ambient air quality standards, and may consider establishing credits for air pollutants other than those designated as criteria air pollutants by the United States Environmental Protection Agency.

Any rule proposed pursuant to this authorization shall be reported to the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor or appropriate subcommittees of the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor prior to its final promulgation; and

In the case of a state implementation plan, provide the right to appeal a final decision rendered by the director or his or her delegate under § 8-4-317.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 2], § 5, as added by Acts 1965, No. 183, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1935; Acts 1993, No. 994, § 1; 1995, No. 895, § 4; 1997, No. 179, § 1; 1997, No. 1219, § 6; 1999, No. 1164, § 31; 2013, No. 1302, §§
2, 3; 2019, No. 315, §§ 490-499; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2527-2536.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment added (a)(13) and (b)(12).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a)(7); deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (a)(11); and made similar changes throughout the section.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language of (a) and in (b)(4); substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section; and added “and the Secretary of the Department of Energy and Environment” in (b)(7).

U.S. Code.

The Clean Air Act referred to in this section is codified primarily as 42 U.S.C. § 7401 et seq.

8-4-312. Factors in exercise of powers.

In exercising their powers and responsibilities under this chapter, the Division of Environmental Quality and the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall take into account and give consideration to the following factors:

The quantity and characteristics of air contaminants and the duration of their presence in the atmosphere that may cause air pollution in a particular area of the state;

Existing physical conditions and topography;

Prevailing wind directions and velocities;

Temperatures and temperature-inversion periods, humidity, and other atmospheric conditions;

Possible chemical reactions between air contaminants or between such air contaminants and air gases, moisture, or sunlight;

The predominant character of development of the area of the state such as residential, highly developed industrial, commercial, or other characteristics;

Availability of air-cleaning devices;

Economic feasibility of air-cleaning devices;

Effect on normal human health of particular air contaminants;

Effect on efficiency of industrial operation resulting from use of air-cleaning devices;

The extent of danger to property in the area reasonably to be expected from any particular air contaminant;

Interference with reasonable enjoyment of life by persons in the area and conduct of established enterprises that can reasonably be expected from air contaminants;

The volume of air contaminants emitted from a particular class of air contamination sources;

The economic and industrial development of the state and the social and economic value of the air contamination sources;

The maintenance of public enjoyment of the state's natural resources; and

Other factors that the division or the commission may find applicable.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 2], § 6, as added by Acts 1965, No. 183, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1936; Acts 1997, No. 1219, § 6; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2537, 2538.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language; and substituted “division” for “department” in (16).

8-4-313. Variance from rules or general orders.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission may grant specific variances from the particular requirements of any rule or general order to such specific persons or class of persons or such specific air contamination source, upon such conditions as it may deem necessary to protect the public health and welfare, if it finds that strict compliance with the rule or general order is inappropriate because of conditions beyond the control of the person granted the variance or because of special circumstances that would render strict compliance unreasonable, unduly burdensome, or impractical due to special physical conditions or causes or because strict compliance would result in substantial curtailment or closing down of a business, plant, or operation or because no alternative facility or method of handling is yet available.

Variances may be limited in time.

In determining whether or not a variance shall be granted, the commission shall weigh the equities involved and the relative advantages and disadvantages to the residents and the occupation and activity affected.

Any person seeking a variance shall do so by filing a petition for a variance with the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality.

The director shall promptly investigate the petition and make a recommendation to the commission as to the disposition thereof.

If the recommendation is against the granting of the variance, a hearing shall be held thereon after not less than ten (10) days, prior to notice to the petitioner.

If the recommendation of the director is for the granting of a variance, the commission may do so without a hearing. However, upon the petition of any person aggrieved by the granting of a variance, a public hearing shall be held.

A variance granted may be revoked or modified by the commission after a public hearing held upon not less than ten (10) days' prior notice.

The notice shall be served upon all persons known to the commission that will be subjected to greater restrictions if the variance is revoked or modified, that are likely to be affected, or that have filed with the commission a written request for such notification.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 2], § 9, as added by Acts 1965, No. 183, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1939; Acts 1997, No. 1219, § 6; 2019, No. 315, § 500; 2019, No. 910, § 2539.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulation” following “rule” twice in (a)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b)(1).

8-4-314. Compliance Advisory Panel — Small Business Stationary Source Technical and Environmental Compliance Assistance Program — Marketing Recyclables Program.

There is created a Compliance Advisory Panel composed of nine (9) individuals.

The panel shall consist of:

Two (2) members appointed by the Governor to represent the general public who are not:

Owners or representatives of owners of small business stationary sources; or

Owners or representatives of owners of a recycling company or the marketing and recyclable community;

Three (3) members selected by the Speaker of the House of Representatives:

One (1) member who is an owner or who represents an owner of small business stationary sources; and

Two (2) members who are owners or representatives of a small business recycling company or the marketing and recyclable community;

Three (3) members selected by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate:

One (1) member who is an owner or who represents an owner of small business stationary sources; and

Two (2) members who are owners or representatives of a small business recycling company or the marketing and recyclable community; and

One (1) member selected by the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality who shall serve as a nonvoting member except when his or her vote is needed to break a tie vote.

Each member shall serve a term of four (4) years.

In the event of a vacancy in the membership of the panel concerning a member selected by the General Assembly or the Governor, the Governor shall appoint a person meeting the applicable eligibility requirements of the vacated position to fill the vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term.

In the event of a vacancy in the membership of the panel concerning the member appointed by the director, the director shall appoint a person to fill the vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term.

The panel shall hold at least one (1) regular meeting each calendar year quarter at a time and place determined by the panel.

At least one (1) meeting each calendar year shall be dedicated to small business stationary sources, with an emphasis on air quality issues.

Special meetings may be called at the discretion of the chair.

The panel shall select a chair by a majority vote of the membership.

Each chair shall serve a term of one (1) year.

Five (5) members of the panel shall constitute a quorum to transact business.

The members of the panel may receive expense reimbursement in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.

If a vacancy occurs in an appointed position for any reason, the vacancy shall be filled by appointment by the official who made the appointment.

The new appointee shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.

The panel shall perform the following duties for the Small Business Stationary Source Technical and Environmental Compliance Assistance Program:

Render advisory opinions concerning the effectiveness of the Small Business Stationary Source Technical and Environmental Compliance Assistance Program, difficulties encountered, and degree and severity of enforcement;

Make periodic reports to the Administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency concerning the compliance of the Small Business Stationary Source Technical and Environmental Compliance Assistance Program with the requirements of the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980, the Regulatory Flexibility Act, 5 U.S.C. § 601 et seq., and the Equal Access to Justice Act, 5 U.S.C. § 504, 28 U.S.C. § 2412, and 42 U.S.C. § 1988;

Review information for small business stationary sources to assure such information is understandable by the layperson; and

Have the Small Business Stationary Source Technical and Environmental Compliance Assistance Program serve as the secretariat for the development and dissemination of such reports and advisory opinions.

The panel shall perform the following duties for the Marketing Recyclables Program:

Develop a program for the coordination of all existing marketing programs for recyclables;

Work with existing industry to encourage the use of recyclables in their manufacturing processes;

Recruit new industries that use recyclables in their manufacturing processes;

Maintain current information on market prices and trends; and

Advise and assist state and local officials in all areas of recyclables marketing, including without limitation the implementation, administration, and funding of the collection and recycling or collection and disposal of extra-large tires as defined in § 8-9-402.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 242, § 2; 1993, No. 251, § 2; 1997, No. 250, § 45; 1999, No. 1164, §§ 32, 33; 2001, No. 1288, § 2; 2017, No. 1067, § 1; 2019, No. 177, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 2540.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1993, Nos. 242 and 251, § 1, provided: “In order to comply with Section 507 of the federal Clean Air Act, this statute is enacted. The program establishes a compliance advisory panel for the Small Business Stationary Source Technical and Environmental Compliance Assistance Program. This program is to be administered by the Arkansas Department of Pollution Control and Ecology and is intended to help eligible small businesses understand and comply with the federal Clean Air Act.”

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment added “Marketing Recyclables Program” to the section heading; and rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment by No. 177 added “including without limitation the implementation, administration, and funding of the collection and recycling or collection and disposal of extra-large tires as defined in § 8-9-402” in (j)(5).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b)(4).

U.S. Code.

The Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980, referred to in this section, is codified primarily as 44 U.S.C. § 3501 et seq.

The Small Business Stationary Source Technical and Environmental Compliance Assistance Program, referred to in this section, was created pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 7401 et seq.

8-4-315. Permits.

The Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality is authorized to require, issue, and enforce operating permits for major sources in satisfaction of Title V of the Clean Air Act Amendments of 1990, 42 U.S.C. § 7661 et seq.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 384, § 11; 1997, No. 310, § 2; 1999, No. 1164, § 34.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1995, No. 384, § 11, provided: “Permit transfers. To the extent consistent with federal requirements, permits issued pursuant to this subchapter may be transferred in accordance with the procedures set out in § 8-4-203(f).”

Acts 1997, No. 310, § 2 has been deemed to amend Acts 1995, No. 384, § 11.

8-4-316. Purpose — Open burning of vegetative storm debris.

The purpose of this section is to allow a county to seek preauthorization of open burning sites for vegetative storm debris from the Division of Environmental Quality to accelerate the cleanup process in the event of a natural disaster.

Unless otherwise prohibited by federal law, a county may conduct open burning to dispose of vegetative storm debris under the procedures, requirements, and limitations under this section if the county has:

Been declared a disaster area by:

The county under § 12-75-108;

The state under § 12-75-107; or

Federal authorities authorized under federal law to make the declaration; or

Otherwise accumulated substantial vegetative storm debris and provided written notice to the division of the accumulation.

A county shall only burn vegetative storm debris at a site that has been preassessed by the division to determine that the site is consistent with all state and federal laws and regulations.

A county that engages in the open burning of vegetative storm debris at a site that has been preassessed by the division shall comply with this section and the procedures established by the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality.

A county may burn vegetative storm debris at no more than four (4) sites at one (1) time unless the director determines that additional open burning sites are necessary.

At least three (3) days before the commencement of open burning, the county shall provide written notification to the director that certifies the preassessed site satisfies the requirements of all applicable laws and regulations, unless notification is waived by the director.

Open burning under this section shall:

Be performed only during daylight hours on Monday through Friday;

Not occur on a state or federal holiday;

Be completed within one hundred twenty (120) days after the written notice or disaster declaration under subsection (b) of this section unless extended by the director;

Be conducted in a manner so as not to create a nuisance to surrounding communities;

Be conducted only if:

The county is in attainment of the National Ambient Air Quality Standards;

A burn ban is not in effect for the county; and

Adequate firefighting personnel are available to respond to an emergency at a designated open burning site;

Comply with all other applicable state, federal, or local statutes, regulations, rules, ordinances, and orders; and

Be conducted no more than two (2) times per calendar year if the county has not been declared a disaster area under subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

Open burning under this section shall:

Not be conducted within:

Five hundred feet (500') of a residence unless the owner of the residence has given written permission for the open burning; or

One thousand feet (1,000') of a school; and

Exclude any nonvegetative storm debris, including without limitation one (1) or more of the following:

Tires;

Lumber;

Construction debris;

Demolished structures;

Household wastes; and

Trade wastes.

The director may require one (1) or more of the following:

That a designated open burning site be relocated;

That an open burning allowed under this section be prohibited in response to actual or potential violations of state or federal air quality standards in the impacted areas; or

An alternative burn period to assure and maintain air quality compliance with National Ambient Air Quality Standards.

The director may recommend alternative methods of vegetative storm debris disposal, including without limitation the use of air curtain incinerators or composting to the extent allowed under federal law.

A county judge shall not obligate state or federal funds for open burning under this section if the county judge has declared the emergency under § 12-75-108.

However, a county judge may be reimbursed from state or federal funds for the cost of the open burning if the director determines that reimbursement is appropriate.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 944, § 1; 2011, No. 10, § 1; 2017, No. 330, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2541, 2542; 2019, No. 1060, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §§ 2541-2542, amended former subsections (b) and (f) of this section to change references to “Arkansas Department” to “Division” and “department” to “division”. However, these references were specifically repealed by Acts 2019, No. 1060, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment added “unless” at the end of the introductory language of (a)(3); and inserted (a)(3)(A) through (C).

The 2017 amendment substituted “Open burning” for “Burning” in the section heading; redesignated and rewrote former (a) as present (a) and (b); redesignated former (b) through (d) as present (c) through (e); substituted “A designated open burning site” for “Designated burning sites” in present (c)(1); inserted “open” in present (c)(2) and (e); added (f) and (g); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” and “division” for “department” throughout the section; and made a stylistic change.

The 2019 amendment by No. 1060, in the section heading, added “Purpose” and inserted “vegetative”; and rewrote the section.